Kentucky statutes. TITLE XVI Motor Vehicles
Motor Vehicle Licenses
186.042.
Accessible parking registration plates and parking privileges for persons with certain disabilities — Application procedure — Issuance.

For the purposes of this section, “persons with disabilities which limit or impair the ability to walk” means persons who:

Cannot walk two hundred (200) feet or sixty-one (61) meters without stopping to rest;

Cannot walk without the use of, or assistance from, a brace, cane, crutch, another person, prosthetic device, wheelchair, or other assistant device;

Are restricted by lung disease to the extent that the person’s forced respiratory and expiratory volume for one (1) second, when measured by spirometry, is less than one (1) liter, or the arterial oxygen tension is less than sixty (60) mm/hg on room air at rest;

Use portable oxygen;

Have a cardiac condition to the extent that the person’s functional limitations are classified in severity as Class III or Class IV according to standards set by the American Heart Association; or

Are severely limited in their ability to walk due to an arthritic, neurological, or orthopedic condition.

On the application of any person with disabilities which limit or impair the ability to walk, who has lost the use of an arm or both arms, or who is blind, the Transportation Cabinet shall issue the person with a disability, the parent or guardian of a disabled minor, or the parent or guardian of a disabled adult, an accessible parking registration plate or renewal decal designating the vehicle licensed as being owned by or leased by a person with a disability or their parent or guardian. The license plate or renewal decal may be issued for a passenger car as set forth in KRS 186.050(1), for a motorcycle as set forth in KRS 186.050(2), or for a commercial vehicle as set forth in KRS 186.050(3)(a). The registration plates issued shall bear the international symbol of access adopted by Rehabilitation International in 1969, reading from left to right and shall be followed by numbers or letters the cabinet finds expedient. Except as provided in this subsection, the cabinet shall not issue the registration plates so designated to any person other than a person with a disability as described above. The fee for a disabled license plate shall be as established in KRS

186.162

.

The application for a license plate for a person with a disability shall be made on a form prepared by the Transportation Cabinet. For every person seeking this accessible parking license plate, proof of the disability shall be required by:

The county clerk issuing the license plate ascertaining that the applicant or the applicant’s minor or adult child is obviously disabled as described in this section; or

A statement from a licensed physician, physician assistant, chiropractor, or advanced practice registered nurse that the applicant or the applicant’s minor or adult child is a person with disabilities which limit or impair the ability to walk, a person who has lost the use of an arm, or any person who is blind.

When a motor vehicle bearing plates issued under this section is being operated by or for the benefit of the person with a disability, who is in the motor vehicle when the motor vehicle is being operated, the motor vehicle may be parked for a period of two (2) hours in excess of the legal parking period permitted by local authorities, except if local ordinances or police regulations prohibit parking on a highway for the purpose of creating a fire lane; if the ordinances or police regulations provide for the accommodation of heavy traffic during morning, afternoon, or evening hours; or if the motor vehicle is parked in such a manner as to clearly be a traffic hazard.

Registration under this section shall expire July 31.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 239, § 3, effective June 17, 1978; 1982, ch. 203, § 4, effective July 15, 1982; 1984, ch. 268, § 1, effective July 13, 1984; 1988, ch. 150, § 3, effective July 15, 1988; 1992, ch. 60, § 2, effective July 14, 1992; 1994, ch. 405, § 36, effective July 15, 1994; 1994, ch. 416, § 4, effective July 15, 1994; 1994, ch. 428, § 5, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 15, § 1, effective July 15, 1998; 2005, ch. 133, § 6, effective June 20, 2005; 2008, ch. 33, § 1, effective July 15, 2008; 2010, ch. 85, § 31, effective July 15, 2010; 2018 ch. 63, § 3, effective July 14, 2018; 2021 ch. 69, § 1, effective June 29, 2021.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(7/15/94). This section was amended by
1994 Ky. Acts chs. 405,
416, and
428. Where these Acts are not in conflict, they have been codified together. Where a conflict exists between chs. 405 and 416, Acts ch. 416, which was enacted after Acts chapter 405 by the General Assembly, prevails under
KRS

446.250

.

Opinions of Attorney General.

A motor vehicle bearing special registration plates should not be ticketed as long as it is parked no longer than two hours past the legal parking period and as long as the vehicle is being operated by the handicapped person or for such person.

OAG 82-161

.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Special handicapped parking permit, KRS

189.456

.

186.0422.
Display of international symbol of access on accessible parking registration plate.

Any person eligible for an accessible parking registration plate under KRS

186.042

who has been issued, or is eligible for, a special license plate shall make application to the cabinet by September 1 of the preceding registration year that the special plate be made to display the international symbol of access adopted by Rehabilitation International in 1969. The fee for a plate issued under this section shall be the same as for the special plate that the person is eligible for. All privileges granted by KRS

186.042

shall apply to license plates issued under this section.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 288, § 1, effective July 15, 1998.

186.0425.
Accessible parking registration plate for vehicle used to transport persons with a disability — Extension of legal parking period.

On the application of any agency or organization which transports persons with a disability described in KRS

186.042

as part of the service provided by that agency or organization to the county clerk for an accessible parking registration plate for a vehicle used in the transportation of persons with a disability, the Transportation Cabinet shall issue the agency or organization an accessible parking registration plate or renewal decal designating the vehicle licensed as being owned or leased by an agency or organization which transports persons with a disability. The license plate or renewal decal may be issued for a passenger car as set forth in KRS 186.050(1) or for a commercial vehicle as set forth in KRS 186.050(3)(a). The registration plates issued shall bear the international symbol of access adopted by Rehabilitation International in 1969, reading from left to right, and shall be followed by the numbers or letters the cabinet finds expedient. The cabinet shall not charge any fee, other than the regular fee for annual registration, for the issuance of the registration plate or renewal decal.

The application for a license plate for an agency or organization which transports persons with a disability shall be made on a form prepared by the Transportation Cabinet. For every agency or organization seeking an accessible parking license plate, the application shall contain at least the following:

Name of the agency or organization requesting use of an accessible parking placard for a person with a disability;

Number of vehicles being used in the transportation of persons with a disability; and

A statement from the director of the agency or organization verifying the need for the parking placard.

Upon the sale, transfer, or termination of lease of a vehicle licensed as authorized under this section, the owner or lessee shall remove the license plate and return it and the certificate of registration to the county clerk. The clerk shall issue a regular license plate and certificate of registration upon the payment of an eleven dollar fifty cent ($11.50) state fee and a three dollar ($3) clerk’s fee. When the accessible parking plate has been presented to the clerk, he shall reissue the plate free of charge by the Transportation Cabinet and upon payment of a two dollar ($2) clerk’s fee, for use on any other vehicle owned or leased by the same agency or organization who purchased the accessible parking plate for the current licensing period. The license plate and decal on the other vehicle shall be turned into the county clerk, who shall forward the license plate to Frankfort.

When a motor vehicle bearing plates issued to an agency or organization which transports persons with a disability as prescribed in this section is being operated for the benefit of a person with a disability who is in the motor vehicle at the time it is being operated, the motor vehicle may be parked for a period of two (2) hours in excess of the legal parking period permitted by local authorities, except where local ordinances or police regulations prohibit parking on a highway for the purpose of creating a fire lane or where the ordinances or police regulations provide for the accommodation of heavy traffic during morning, afternoon, or evening hours or where the motor vehicle is parked in such a manner as to clearly be a traffic hazard.

Registration under this section shall expire July 31.

The cabinet may promulgate the administrative regulations necessary to further the purpose of this section.

History.

Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 60, § 3, effective July 14, 1992; 1994, ch. 405, § 37, effective July 15, 1994; 1994, ch. 416, § 5, effective July 15, 1994; 1994, ch. 428, § 6, effective July 15, 1994.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(7/15/94). This section was amended by 1994 Ky. Acts chs. 405, 416, and 428. Where these Acts are not in conflict, they have been codified together. Where a conflict exists between chs. 405 and 416, Acts ch. 416, which was enacted after Acts ch. 405 by the General Assembly, prevails under KRS

446.250

.

186.043.
Special license plates for historic motor vehicles — Permanent registration.

In enacting this section, it is the intention of the General Assembly to recognize the special value of historic vehicles to the Commonwealth, and also to recognize that historic vehicles, because of their limited use and easily identifiable characteristics, do not require the same degree of regulation as other vehicles.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires, “historic vehicle” shall mean all motor vehicles twenty-five (25) years old or older, which are used primarily for exhibition in shows, parades, tours, and other special uses, but not for general transportation.

Historic vehicles shall be registered and licensed by the Transportation Cabinet. The registration shall be in lieu of registration and license required by KRS

186.020

to

186.270

.

Upon payment of the fee established in KRS

186.162

and an application in accordance with regulations issued by the Transportation Cabinet, the secretary of the Transportation Cabinet shall issue a certificate of registration and two (2) special license plates of a different color and design than the regular license plate, which, in the judgment of the secretary of the Transportation Cabinet, will best advertise, popularize, and promote the Commonwealth of Kentucky. These plates, besides the word “Kentucky” shall have the words, “Historic Motor Vehicle” inscribed in a conspicuous manner and carry no year date. These plates shall have a serial number beginning with the number “100” and continue in a consecutive numerical sequence.

Historic vehicles may display an authentic Kentucky license plate, twenty-five (25) years or older, or a reproduction of such a plate, if the historic motor vehicle plate and the registration receipt are kept in the vehicle at all times.

The registration license and license plates of historic motor vehicles shall be valid without renewal as long as the vehicle is in existence. If the historic motor vehicle is sold, the registration and license shall be assigned and transferred to the new owner on the records of the Transportation Cabinet upon receipt of an application in accordance with regulations issued by the cabinet and payment of a fee of three dollars ($3).

History.

Enact. Acts 1968, ch. 14, §§ 1 to 5, 7; 1974, ch. 74, Art. IV, § 20(9), (10); 1978, ch. 69, § 1, effective June 17, 1978; 1984, ch. 169, § 3, effective July 13, 1984; 1992, ch. 117, § 1, effective July 14, 1992; 1994, ch. 428, § 7, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 343, § 1, effective July 15, 1998; 2005, ch. 133, § 7, effective June 20, 2005.

Opinions of Attorney General.

The license plate for a historic vehicle must remain with the particular vehicle which is registered with the county clerk and for which the plate was purchased and cannot be transferred or changed to other historic vehicles that may be in the owner’s possession.

OAG 69-540

.

When a historic vehicle is sold and transferred in Kentucky or to someone outside the state, the plate or tag must remain with the vehicle.

OAG 69-540

.

186.0435.
Display of vintage Kentucky license plates on historic vehicle.

Any motor vehicle that meets the age requirements of a “historic vehicle” as used in KRS 186.043(2) and is registered in accordance with KRS

186.050

may display an authentic Kentucky license plate, twenty-five (25) years or older, or a reproduction of such a plate, if the current motor vehicle plate and the registration receipt are kept in the vehicle at all times.

History.

Enact. Acts 2007, ch. 135, § 1, effective June 26, 2007.

186.044.
License plates for recipients of a Purple Heart medal. [Repealed.]

186.045.
Discharge by payment in full — Termination statement and record of termination of security interest — Filing — Time — Fees — Notations showing security interest — Clerk not liable for accepting fraudulent termination statement. [Effective until January 1, 2024]

A perfected security interest in a motor vehicle that has been satisfied by payment in full shall be deemed to have been discharged if one (1) or both of the following events has occurred:

The funds to pay in full and discharge the security interest have been provided to the secured party in the form of a cashier’s check, certified check, or wire transfer; or

The debt has been paid to a secured party who is no longer in existence or has failed to file the necessary documents to discharge the lien.

If payment in full has been made under subsection (1)(a) of this section, the discharge of the lien shall be made not later than ten (10) days from the receipt of the payment.

When a security interest has been paid in full and a termination statement or discharge has not been filed, the debtor may petition the Circuit Court in the county of the debtor’s residence to order the discharge of the security interest. The debtor shall present written evidence to the Circuit Court that the security interest has been paid in full. If the evidence presented to the Circuit Court proves to the court’s satisfaction that the security interest has been paid in full, the court shall order the county clerk to note the termination on the title and to remove the lien from the Automated Vehicle Information System (AVIS). A copy of the court’s order shall immediately be sent to the county clerk in the county where the security interest was originally filed and the county clerk shall discharge the security interest and remove the lien information from AVIS in accordance with the provisions of this section.

Whenever a security interest has been discharged, other than by proceedings under Part 6 of Article 9 of KRS Chapter 355 or similar proceedings, the secured party shall:

Deliver an authenticated termination statement in the manner required by KRS

355.9-513

and

186A.195

to the county clerk of the county in which the title lien statement was submitted; or

Have a county clerk from another county submit by fax or other form of electronic communication available and acceptable to both sender and recipient, and verified verbally or by electronically assigned identification as being from the sending clerk, and which is able to be copied to an electronic or paper file, on that county clerk’s letterhead, an authenticated termination statement in the manner required by KRS

186A.195

and

355.9-513

to the county clerk of the county in which the title lien statement was submitted. The county clerk, upon receipt of the authenticated termination statement in the manner prescribed under this paragraph, shall verify the legitimacy of the document.

The secured party shall also deliver a copy of the termination statement to the debtor or the debtor’s transferee. For failure to file the termination statement within the allowable time, the secured party shall be subject to the penalty provided in KRS 186.990(1). Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, within five (5) days after the receipt of such documents, the county clerk shall note the filing in the index, in language prescribed by the cabinet, that the termination statement has been filed. Upon presentation of the owner’s title showing a security interest to the county clerk where the termination statement was submitted, and with the copy of the termination statement submitted by the secured party, the clerk shall discharge the security interest by noting on the title that the termination statement has been filed and place the seal of the county clerk thereon. The clerk shall return the owner’s title to the owner. The county clerk shall then file the termination statement in the place from which the title lien statement was removed. Termination statements shall be retained in the clerk’s files for a period of two (2) years subsequent to the date of filing a statement, at which time they may be destroyed. The fee for these services are included in the provisions of KRS

186A.190

.

Upon presentation of an owner’s title showing a security interest to the county clerk of a county where the termination statement was not delivered, the county clerk shall access the automated system to determine whether a record of termination of the security interest has been entered into the automated system by the county clerk where the termination statement was delivered by the secured party as provided in KRS

186A.210

. If a record of termination has been entered into the automated system, the county clerk of the county where the termination statement was not delivered, shall note the discharge of the security interest on the certificate of title by noting that the termination statement has been delivered, the county where it was delivered, and placing the seal of the county clerk thereon and may rely on the automated system to do so. If a record of termination has not been entered into the automated system, the county clerk of the county other than where the termination statement was delivered shall not make any notation upon the certificate of title that the security interest has been discharged or that a termination statement has been delivered to the county where the title lien statement was submitted.

Whenever any secured party repossesses a vehicle titled in Kentucky, for which a security interest is in existence at the time of repossession, and disposes of the vehicle pursuant to the provisions of KRS Chapter 355, the secured party shall present, within fifteen (15) days after such disposition, the vehicle’s license plate if the plate has not been retained by the previous owner, an affidavit in a form prescribed by the department, proof of notification of all interested parties pursuant to KRS

186A.190

and

355.9-611

, and a termination statement or proof that a termination statement has been filed. The new owner shall pay to the county clerk all applicable fees for titling and transferring the vehicle into his or her name. Upon receipt of such documents, the county clerk who issued the lien shall then omit from the title he makes application for any information relating to the security interest under which the vehicle was repossessed or any security interest subordinate thereto. However, any security interest, as shown by such title which is superior to the one under which the vehicle was repossessed, shall be shown on the title issued by the clerk unless the prior secured party has discharged the security interest in the clerk’s office or proof of termination is submitted, if the prior security interest was discharged in another clerk’s office.

Whenever any vehicle brought into Kentucky is required to be titled and the vehicle is then subject to a security interest in another state as shown by the out-of-state documents presented to the clerk, the county clerk is prohibited from processing the application for title on the vehicle unless the owner obtains from the secured party a financing statement or title lien statement and presents same to the clerk along with the fees required in KRS

186A.190

. The clerk shall note the out-of-state security interest on the certificate of title. This provision does not apply to vehicles required to be registered in Kentucky under forced registration provisions under KRS

186.145

.

The fees provided for in this section are in addition to any state fee provided for by law.

Any person violating any provision of this section or any person refusing to surrender a certificate of title registration and ownership or transfer certificate upon request of any person entitled thereto, is subject to the penalties provided in subsection (1) of KRS

186.990

.

The county clerk is prohibited from noting any security interest on a certificate of title on any vehicle subject to the provisions of KRS Chapter 186A if a certificate of title therefor is presented to him which has all the spaces provided thereon for noting security interests fully exhausted. The owner is responsible for ensuring that a discharge is noted on the certificate of title for each security interest and then a duplicate title as provided for in KRS

186A.180

shall be obtained from the clerk by the owner of the vehicle.

Security interests in vehicles sold to or owned by residents of other states shall be perfected in the state of the nonresident and repossession of the vehicle shall be taken pursuant to the laws of that state, unless:

The vehicle is principally operated in Kentucky;

The vehicle is properly titled in Kentucky under KRS Chapter 186A; and

The security interest is authorized to be noted on the certificate of title by the county clerk under KRS Chapter 186A.

A county clerk who accepts an authenticated termination statement and complies with the verification requirements of subsection (4)(b) of this section shall be held harmless from any liability arising from fraudulent termination statements.

History.

Enact. Acts 1964, ch. 59, § 2; 1966, ch. 83, § 1; 1966, ch. 255, § 169; 1972, ch. 203, § 35; 1974, ch. 222, § 2; 1978, ch. 84, § 5, effective June 17, 1978; 1980, ch. 321, § 1, effective July 15, 1980; 1986, ch. 118, § 103, effective July 1, 1987; 1998, ch. 128, § 9, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 408, § 178, effective July 1, 2001; 2003, ch. 103, § 1, effective June 24, 2003; 2004, ch. 25, § 1, effective July 13, 2004; 2011, ch. 5, § 2, effective January 1, 2014; 2016 ch. 8, § 1, effective July 15, 2016.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(7/12/2012). The amendment of this statute in 2011 Ky. Acts ch. 5 was to be effective January 1, 2013, pursuant to Section 7 of that Act. However, in 2012 Ky. Acts ch. 12, sec. 1, 2011 Ky. Acts ch. 5, sec. 7, was repealed, and a new effective date of January 1, 2014, was established for the 2011 amendment of this statute, pursuant to 2012 Ky. Acts ch. 12, sec. 2.

186.045.
Discharge by payment in full — Duties of secured party when security interest is discharged — Filing — Time — Fees — Notations showing security interest — Clerk not liable for accepting fraudulent termination statement. [Effective January 1, 2024]

A perfected security interest in a motor vehicle that has been satisfied by payment in full shall be deemed to have been discharged if one (1) or both of the following events has occurred:

The funds to pay in full and discharge the security interest have been provided to the secured party in the form of a cashier’s check, certified check, or wire transfer; or

The debt has been paid to a secured party who is no longer in existence or has failed to file the necessary documents to discharge the lien.

If payment in full has been made under subsection (1)(a) of this section, the discharge of the lien shall be made not later than ten (10) days from the receipt of the payment.

When a security interest has been paid in full and a termination statement or discharge has not been filed, the debtor may petition the Circuit Court in the county of the debtor’s residence to order the discharge of the security interest. The debtor shall present written evidence to the Circuit Court that the security interest has been paid in full. If the evidence presented to the Circuit Court proves to the court’s satisfaction that the security interest has been paid in full, the court shall order the county clerk to note the termination on the title and to remove the lien from the Automated Vehicle Information System (AVIS). A copy of the court’s order shall immediately be sent to the county clerk in the county where the security interest was originally filed and the county clerk shall discharge the security interest and remove the lien information from AVIS in accordance with the provisions of this section.

Whenever a security interest has been discharged, other than by proceedings under Part 6 of Article 9 of KRS Chapter 355 or similar proceedings, the secured party shall:

For a security interest perfected prior to January 1, 2024:

Deliver an authenticated termination statement in the manner required by KRS

355.9-513

to the county clerk of the county in which the title lien statement was submitted; or

Have a county clerk from another county submit by fax or other form of electronic communication available and acceptable to both sender and recipient, and verified verbally or by electronically assigned identification as being from the sending clerk, and which is able to be copied to an electronic or paper file, on that county clerk’s letterhead, an authenticated termination statement in the manner required by KRS

355.9-513

to the county clerk of the county in which the title lien statement was submitted. The county clerk, upon receipt of the authenticated termination statement in the manner prescribed under this paragraph, shall verify the legitimacy of the document; or

For a security interest perfected on or after January 1, 2024, submit an authenticated termination statement to a county clerk in the same manner as a title lien statement under KRS

186A.195

; and

Deliver a copy of the termination statement to the debtor or the debtor’s transferee.

For failure to file the termination statement within the allowable time, the secured party shall be subject to the penalty provided in KRS 186.990(1). Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, within five (5) days after the receipt of these documents, the county clerk shall enter the filing into the system of record. The county clerk shall then file the termination statement in the place from which the title lien statement was removed. Termination statements shall be retained in the clerk’s files for a period of two (2) years subsequent to the date of filing a statement, at which time they may be destroyed. The fee for these services are included in the provisions of KRS

186A.190

.

Upon presentation of an owner’s title showing a security interest to the county clerk of a county where the termination statement was not delivered, the county clerk shall access the automated system to determine whether a record of termination of the security interest has been entered into the automated system by the county clerk where the termination statement was delivered by the secured party as provided in KRS

186A.210

. If a record of termination has been entered into the automated system, the county clerk of the county where the termination statement was not delivered shall note the discharge of the security interest on the certificate of title by noting that the termination statement has been delivered, the county where it was delivered, and placing the seal of the county clerk thereon and may rely on the automated system to do so. If a record of termination has not been entered into the automated system, the county clerk of the county other than where the termination statement was delivered shall not make any notation upon the certificate of title that the security interest has been discharged or that a termination statement has been delivered to the county where the title lien statement was submitted.

Whenever any secured party repossesses a vehicle titled in Kentucky, for which a security interest is in existence at the time of repossession, and disposes of the vehicle pursuant to the provisions of KRS Chapter 355, the secured party shall present, within fifteen (15) days after the disposition, the vehicle’s license plate if the plate has not been retained by the previous owner, an affidavit in a form prescribed by the department, proof of notification of all interested parties pursuant to KRS

186A.190

and

355.9-611

, and a termination statement or proof that a termination statement has been filed. The new owner shall pay to the county clerk all applicable fees for titling and transferring the vehicle into his or her name. Upon receipt of the documents, the county clerk who issued the lien shall then omit from the new title application any information relating to the security interest under which the vehicle was repossessed or any security interest subordinate thereto. However, any security interest, as shown by the title which is superior to the one under which the vehicle was repossessed, shall be shown on the title issued by the clerk unless the prior secured party has discharged the security interest in the clerk’s office or proof of termination is submitted, if the prior security interest was discharged in another clerk’s office.

Whenever any vehicle brought into Kentucky is required to be titled and the vehicle is then subject to a security interest in another state as shown by the out-of-state documents presented to the clerk, the county clerk is prohibited from processing the application for title on the vehicle unless the owner obtains from the secured party a financing statement or title lien statement and presents same to the clerk along with the fees required in KRS

186A.190

. The clerk shall note the out-of-state security interest on the certificate of title. This provision does not apply to vehicles required to be registered in Kentucky under forced registration provisions under KRS

186.145

.

The fees provided for in this section are in addition to any state fee provided for by law.

Any person violating any provision of this section or any person refusing to surrender a certificate of title registration and ownership or transfer certificate upon request of any person entitled thereto, is subject to the penalties provided in subsection (1) of KRS

186.990

.

The county clerk is prohibited from noting any security interest on a certificate of title on any vehicle subject to the provisions of KRS Chapter 186A if a certificate of title therefor is presented to the clerk which has all the spaces provided thereon for noting security interests fully exhausted. The owner is responsible for ensuring that a discharge is noted on the certificate of title for each security interest and then a duplicate title as provided for in KRS

186A.180

shall be obtained from the clerk by the owner of the vehicle.

Security interests in vehicles sold to or owned by residents of other states shall be perfected in the state of the nonresident and repossession of the vehicle shall be taken pursuant to the laws of that state, unless:

The vehicle is principally operated in Kentucky;

The vehicle is properly titled in Kentucky under KRS Chapter 186A; and

The security interest is authorized to be noted on the certificate of title by the county clerk under KRS Chapter 186A.

A county clerk who accepts an authenticated termination statement and complies with the verification requirements of subsection (4)(a)1.b. of this section shall be held harmless from any liability arising from fraudulent termination statements.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1964, ch. 59, § 2; 1966, ch. 83, § 1; 1966, ch. 255, § 169; 1972, ch. 203, § 35; 1974, ch. 222, § 2; 1978, ch. 84, § 5, effective June 17, 1978; 1980, ch. 321, § 1, effective July 15, 1980; 1986, ch. 118, § 103, effective July 1, 1987; 1998, ch. 128, § 9, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 408, § 178, effective July 1, 2001; 2003, ch. 103, § 1, effective June 24, 2003; 2004, ch. 25, § 1, effective July 13, 2004; 2011, ch. 5, § 2, effective January 1, 2014; 2016 ch. 8, § 1, effective July 15, 2016; 2022 ch. 18, § 8, effective January 1, 2024.

186.047.
Lapsed financing statement. [Repealed.]

186.049.
Voluntary donation to the Kentucky Circuit Clerks’ Trust for Life to promote organ donation.

Any person applying online for motor vehicle registration renewal shall be requested by the cabinet, at the time of renewal, to make a voluntary donation to promote an organ donor program.

A county clerk may ask any person applying for an initial or renewal motor vehicle registration to make a voluntary donation to promote an organ donor program.

Any donation under this section shall be added to the regular fee for motor vehicle registration renewal.

Any donation made under subsection (1)(a) of this section shall be paid to the cabinet and shall be forwarded by the cabinet on a monthly basis to the Kentucky Circuit Court Clerks’ Trust for Life, and such moneys are hereby appropriated to be used exclusively for the purpose of promoting an organ donor program. A donation under this section shall be voluntary and may be refused by the applicant at the time of online renewal.

Any donation made under subsection (1)(b) of this section shall be paid to the county clerk and forwarded by the county clerk on a monthly basis to the Kentucky Circuit Court Clerks’ Trust for Life, and such moneys are hereby appropriated to be used exclusively for the purpose of promoting an organ donor program. A donation under this section shall be voluntary and may be refused by the applicant at the time of application.

The cabinet shall provide an opportunity for any person applying for online motor vehicle registration renewal to express willingness to make an anatomical gift under KRS

311.1917

. If a person who has made a declaration under this subsection wishes to rescind that declaration, that person shall notify the Kentucky Circuit Court Clerks’ Trust for Life, which shall remove the person from their records.

A county clerk may provide an opportunity for any person applying for initial or renewal motor vehicle registration, to express willingness to make an anatomical gift under KRS

311.1917

. If a person who has made a declaration under this subsection wishes to rescind that declaration, that person shall notify the Kentucky Circuit Court Clerks’ Trust for Life, which shall remove the person from their records.

The Transportation Cabinet may promulgate administrative regulations pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A to implement the provisions of this section.

HISTORY:

2022 ch. 16, § 1, effective July 14, 2022.